District of Columbia statutes.
44-301.11

Availability of District external review procedures for self-insured plans.

A group health plan that is located in the District but that is not subject to District regulation may voluntarily use the District’s external review system; provided, that it pays the full costs of external review and adheres to the procedures set forth in § 44-301.07.

History

Apr. 27, 1999, D.C. Law 12-274, § 111
as added Mar. 19, 2013, D.C. Law 19-229, § 2(i), 59 DCR 13592

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-229 added this section.